California statutes. Probate Code
(b) The petition shall set forth a description of the trust and the names of creditors with respect to which action is requested and a description of each claim, together with the requested determination by the court with respect to the claims, provided, however, that this section does not require the filing of a copy of the trust or disclosure of the beneficial interests of the trust. That petition shall also set forth the beneficiaries of the trust, those claimants whose interest in the trust may be affected by the petition, and the trustees of any other trust to which an allocation of liability may be approved by the court pursuant to the petition.

(c) The clerk shall set the matter for hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 159, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

19023.

At least 30 days before the time set for the hearing on the petition, the petitioner shall cause notice of the time and place of the hearing and a copy of the petition to be served on each of the creditors whose interests in the estate may be affected by the petition in the manner provided in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 413.10) of Title 5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 159, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

19024.

At least 30 days before the time set for the hearing on the petition, the petitioner shall cause notice of the time and place of the hearing, together with a copy of the petition, to be delivered pursuant to Section 1215 to each of the following persons who is not a petitioner:

(a) All trustees of the trust and of any other trusts to which an allocation of liability may be approved by the court pursuant to the petition.

(b) All beneficiaries affected.

(c) The personal representative of the deceased settlor’s probate estate, if any is known to the trustee.

(d) The Attorney General, if the petition relates to a charitable trust subject to the jurisdiction of the Attorney General, unless the Attorney General waives notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 100.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19025.

(a) If any creditor, beneficiary, or trustee fails timely to file a written pleading upon notice, then the case is at issue, notwithstanding the failure. The case may proceed on the petition and written statements filed by the time of the hearing, and no further pleadings by other persons are necessary. The creditor, beneficiary, or trustee who failed timely to file a written pleading upon notice may not participate further in the proceeding for the determination requested, and that creditor, beneficiary, or trustee shall be bound by the decision in the proceeding.

(b) The court’s order, when final, shall be conclusive as to the liability of the trust property with respect to the claims at issue in the petition. In the
 event of a subsequent administration of the
 probate estate of the deceased settlor, that order shall be binding on the personal representative of the probate estate of the deceased settlor as well as all creditors and beneficiaries who had notice of the petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 48, Sec. 7.   (SB 785)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

19026.

The court may dismiss a petition if it appears that the proceeding is not reasonably necessary for the protection of the interests of the trustee or any beneficiary of the trust.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 992, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

19027.

(a) The court in its discretion may make any orders and take any other action necessary or proper to dispose of the matters presented by the petition. 

(b) If the court determines that the assets of the trust estate are insufficient to pay all debts, then the court shall order payment in the manner specified by Section 11420.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 992, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

19029.

The court may, on its own motion or on request of a trustee or other person interested in the trust, appoint a guardian ad litem in accordance with Section 1003.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 992, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

19030.

In a case involving a charitable trust subject to the jurisdiction of the Attorney General, the Attorney General may petition under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 992, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Publication of Notice [19040. - 19041.]

19040.

(a) Publication of notice pursuant to this section shall be for at least 15 days. Three publications in a newspaper published once a week or more often, with at least five days intervening between the first and last publication dates, not counting the first and last publication dates as part of the five-day period, are sufficient. Notice shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the city, county, or city and county in this state where the deceased settlor resided at the time of death, or if none, in the city, county, or city and county in this state wherein trust property was located at the time of the settlor’s death, or if none, in the city, county, or city and county in this state wherein the
 principal place of administration of the trust was located at the time of the settlor’s death. If there is no newspaper of general circulation published in the applicable city, county, or city and county, notice shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation published in this state nearest to the applicable city, county, or city and county seat, and which is circulated within the applicable city, county, or city and county. If there is no such newspaper, notice shall be given in written or printed form, posted at three of the most public places within the community. For purposes of this section, “city” means a charter city as defined in Section 34101 of the Government Code or a general law city as defined in Section 34102 of the Government Code.

(b) The caption of the notice, the deceased settlor’s name, and the name of
 the trustee shall be in at least 8-point type, the text of the notice shall be in at least 7-point type, and the notice shall state substantially as follows: 
NOTICE TO CREDITORS 
OF _____________# ____________SUPERIOR COURT OF CALIFORNIACOUNTY OF _________Notice is hereby given to the creditors and contingent creditors of the above-named decedent, that all persons having claims against the decedent are required to file them with the Superior Court, at _______, and deliver pursuant to Section 1215 of the California Probate
 Code a copy to _____, as trustee of the trust dated ____ wherein the decedent was the settlor, at _____, within the later of four months after ____ (the date of the first publication of notice to creditors) or, if notice is mailed or personally delivered to you, 60 days after the date this notice is mailed or personally delivered to you. A claim form may be obtained from the court clerk. For your protection, you are encouraged to file your claim by certified mail, with return receipt requested.(name and address of trustee or attorney)(c) An affidavit showing due publication of notice shall be filed with the clerk upon completion of the publication. The affidavit shall
 contain a copy of the notice, and state the date of its first publication.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 101.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19041.

The Legislature finds and declares that to be most effective, notice to creditors should be published in compliance with the procedures specified in Section 19040. However, the Legislature recognizes the possibility that in unusual cases due to confusion over jurisdictional boundaries or oversights the notice may inadvertently be published in a newspaper which does not meet these requirements. Therefore, to prevent a minor error in publication from invalidating what would otherwise be a proper proceeding, the Legislature further finds and declares that notice published in a good faith attempt to comply with Section 19040 shall be sufficient to provide notice
 to creditors and establish jurisdiction if the court expressly finds that the notice was published in a newspaper of general circulation published within the city, county, or city and county and widely circulated within a true cross section of the community in which the deceased settlor resided or wherein the principal place of administration of the trust was located or the property was located in substantial compliance with Section 19040.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 992, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Actual Notice to Creditors [19050. - 19054.]

19050.

Except as provided in Section 19054, if the trustee has knowledge of a creditor of the deceased settlor, the trustee shall give notice to the creditor. The notice shall be given as provided in Section 1215. For the purpose of this section, a trustee has knowledge of a creditor of the deceased settlor if the trustee is aware that the creditor has demanded payment from the deceased settlor or the trust estate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 159, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

19051.

The notice shall be given before expiration of the later of the following times:

(a) Four months after the first publication of notice under Section 19040.

(b) Thirty days after the trustee first has knowledge of the creditor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 159, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

19052.

The notice shall be in substantially the following form:
NOTICE TO CREDITORS
OF _____________
# ____________
 SUPERIOR COURT OF CALIFORNIA
 COUNTY OF _________

Notice is hereby given to the creditors and contingent creditors of the above-named decedent, that all persons having claims against the decedent are required to file them with the Superior Court, at _______, and deliver pursuant to Section 1215 of the California Probate Code a copy to ______, as trustee of the trust dated _____ wherein the decedent was the settlor, at _______, within the later of four months after _____ (the date of the first publication of notice
 to creditors) or, if notice is mailed or personally delivered to you, 60 days after the date this notice is mailed or personally delivered to you, or you must petition to file a late claim as provided in Section 19103 of the Probate Code. A claim form may be obtained from the court clerk. For your protection, you are encouraged to file your claim by certified mail, with return receipt requested.
__________________________
(Date of mailing this
 notice if applicable)

___________________________
(name and address of
 trustee or attorney)

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 102.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19053.

(a) If the trustee believes that notice to a particular creditor is or may be required by this chapter and gives notice based on that belief, the trustee is not liable to any person for giving the notice, whether or not required by this chapter.

(b) If the trustee fails to give notice required by this chapter, the trustee is not liable to any person for that failure, unless a creditor establishes all of the following:

(1) The failure was in bad faith.

(2) The creditor did not have actual knowledge of the proceedings under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 19000) sooner than one year after publication of notice to creditors under Section 19040, and payment would have been made on the creditor’s claim if the claim had been properly filed.

(3) Within 16 months after the first publication of notice under Section 19040, the creditor did both of the following:

(A) Filed a petition requesting that the court in which the proceedings under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 19000) were initiated make an order determining the liability of the trustee under this subdivision.

(B) At least 30 days before the hearing on the petition, caused notice of the hearing and a copy of the petition to be served on the trustee in the manner provided in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 413.10) of Title 5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(c) Nothing in this section affects the liability of the trust estate, if any, for the claim of a creditor, and the trustee is not liable to the extent the claim is paid out of the trust estate.

(d) Nothing in this chapter imposes a duty on the trustee to make a search for creditors of the deceased settlor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 159, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

19054.

Notwithstanding Section 19050, the trustee need not give notice to a creditor even though the trustee has knowledge of the creditor if either of the following conditions is satisfied:

(a) The creditor has filed a claim as provided in this part. 

(b) The creditor has demanded payment and the trustee elects to treat the demand as a claim under Section 19154.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 32, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Time for Filing Claims [19100. - 19104.]

19100.

(a) A creditor shall file a claim before expiration of the later of the following times:

(1) Four months after the first publication of notice to creditors under Section 19040.

(2) Sixty days after the date actual notice is mailed or personally delivered to the creditor. This paragraph does not extend the time provided in Section 366.2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(b) A reference in another statute to the time for filing a claim means the time provided in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(c) This section shall not be interpreted to extend or toll any other statute of limitations, including that provided by Section 366.2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 159, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

19101.

A vacancy in the office of the trustee that occurs before expiration of the time for filing a claim does not extend the time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 992, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

19102.

A claim that is filed before expiration of the time for filing the claim is timely even if acted on by the trustee or the court after expiration of the time for filing claims.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 992, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

19103.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), upon petition by a creditor or a trustee, the court may allow a claim to be filed after expiration of the time for filing a claim provided in Section 19100 if either of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The trustee failed to send proper and timely notice to the creditor and the petition is filed within 60 days after the creditor has actual knowledge of the administration of the trust.

(2) The creditor did not have knowledge of the facts giving rise to the existence of the claim more than 30 days prior to the time for filing a claim as provided in Section 19100, and the petition is filed within 60 days after the creditor has actual knowledge of both of the following:

(A) The existence of the facts reasonably giving rise to the existence of the claim.

(B) The administration of the trust.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the court shall not allow a claim to be filed under this section more than one year after the date of first publication of notice to creditors under Section 19040. Nothing in this subdivision authorizes allowance or approval of a claim barred by, or extends the time provided in, Section 366.2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(c) The court may condition the claim on terms that are just and equitable. The court may deny the claimant’s petition if a distribution to trust beneficiaries or payment to general creditors has been made and it appears the filing or establishment of the claim would cause or tend to cause unequal treatment among beneficiaries or creditors.

(d) Regardless of whether the claim is later established in whole or in part, property distributed under the terms of the trust subsequent to an order settling claims under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 19020) and payments otherwise properly made before a claim is filed under this section are not subject to the claim. Except to the extent provided in Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 19400) and subject to Section 19053, the trustee, distributee, or payee is not liable on account of the prior distribution or payment. This subdivision does not limit the liability of a person who receives a preliminary distribution of property to restore to the trust an amount sufficient for payment of the beneficiary’s proper share of the claim, not exceeding the amount distributed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 159, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

19104.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), if a claim is filed within the time provided in this chapter, the creditor may later amend or revise the claim. The amendment or revision shall be filed in the same manner as the claim.

(b) An amendment or revision may not be made to increase the amount of the claim after the time for filing a claim has expired. An amendment or revision to specify the amount of a claim that, at the time of filing, was not due, was contingent, or was not yet ascertainable, is not an increase in the amount of the claim within the meaning of this subdivision. An amendment or revision of a claim may not be made for any purpose after the earlier of the following times:

(1) The time the court makes an order approving settlement of the claim against the deceased settlor under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 19020).

(2) One year after the date of the first publication of notice to creditors under Section 19040. Nothing in this paragraph authorizes allowance or approval of a claim barred by, or extends the time provided in, Section 366.2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 159, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Filing of Claims [19150. - 19154.]

19150.

(a) A claim may be filed by the creditor or a person acting on behalf of the claimant.

(b) A claim shall be filed with the court and a copy shall be delivered to the trustee pursuant to Section 1215. Failure to deliver a copy to the trustee does not invalidate a properly filed claim, but any loss that results from the failure shall be borne by the creditor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 103.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19151.

(a) A claim shall be supported by the affidavit of the creditor or the person on behalf of the claimant stating:

(1) The claim is a just claim.

(2) If the claim is due, the facts supporting the claim, the amount of the claim, and that all payments on and offsets to the claim have been credited.

(3) If the claim is not due or contingent, or the amount is not yet ascertainable, the facts supporting the claim.

(4) If the affidavit is made by a person other than the creditor, the reason it is not made by the creditor.

(b) The trustee may require satisfactory vouchers or proof to be produced to support the claim. An original voucher may be withdrawn after a copy is provided. If a copy is provided, the copy shall be attached to the claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 159, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

19152.

(a) If a claim is based on a written instrument, either the original or a copy of the original with all endorsements shall be attached to the claim. If a copy is attached, the original instrument shall be exhibited to the trustee on demand unless it is lost or destroyed, in which case the fact that it is lost or destroyed shall be stated in the claim.

(b) If the claim or a part of the claim is secured by a mortgage, deed of trust, or other lien that is recorded in the office of the recorder of the county in which the property subject to the lien is located, it is sufficient to describe the mortgage, deed of trust, or lien and the recording reference for the instrument that created the mortgage, deed of trust, or other lien.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 992, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

19153.

The Judicial Council may adopt a claim form which shall inform the creditor that the claim must be filed with the court and a copy delivered to the trustee pursuant to Section 1215. Any such claim form shall include a proof of delivery of a copy of the claim to the trustee which may be completed by the creditor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 104.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19154.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, if a creditor makes a written demand for payment within the time specified in Section 19100, the trustee may waive formal defects and elect to treat the demand as a claim that is filed and established under this part by paying the amount demanded.

(b) Nothing in this section limits application of the doctrines of waiver, estoppel, laches, or detrimental reliance or any other equitable principle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 159, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Claims by Public Entities [19200. - 19205.]

19200.

(a) Except as provided in this chapter, a claim by a public entity shall be filed within the time otherwise provided in this part. A claim not so filed is barred, including any lien imposed for the claim. 

(b) As used in this chapter, “public entity” has the meaning provided in Section 811.2 of the Government Code, and includes an officer authorized to act on behalf of the public entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 992, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

19201.

(a) Notwithstanding any other statute, if a claim of a public entity arises under a law, act, or code listed in subdivision (b):

(1) The public entity may provide a form to be used for the written notice or request to the public entity required by this chapter. Where appropriate, the form may require the decedent’s social security number, if known.

(2) The claim is barred only after written notice or request to the public entity and expiration of the period provided in the applicable section. If no written notice or request is made, the claim is enforceable by the remedies, and is barred at the time, otherwise provided in the law, act, or code.

(b) Law, Act, or CodeApplicable SectionSales and Use Tax Law (commencing with Section 6001 of the Revenue and Taxation Code)Section 6487.1 of the Revenue and Taxation CodeBradley-Burns Uniform Local Sales and Use Tax Law (commencing with Section 7200 of the Revenue and Taxation Code)Section 6487.1 of the Revenue and Taxation CodeTransactions and Use Tax Law (commencing with Section 7251 of the Revenue and Taxation Code)Section 6487.1 of the Revenue and Taxation CodeMotor Vehicle Fuel License Tax Law (commencing with Section 7301 of the Revenue and Taxation Code)Section 7675.1 of the Revenue and Taxation CodeUse Fuel Tax Law (commencing with Section 8601 of the Revenue and Taxation Code)Section 8782.1 of the Revenue and Taxation CodeAdministration of Franchise and Income Tax Law
 (commencing with Section 18401 of the Revenue and Taxation Code)Section 19517 of the Revenue and Taxation CodeCigarette Tax Law (commencing with Section 30001 of the Revenue and Taxation Code)Section 30207.1 of the Revenue and Taxation CodeAlcoholic Beverage Tax Law (commencing with Section 32001 of the Revenue and Taxation Code)Section 32272.1 of the Revenue and Taxation CodeUnemployment Insurance CodeSection 1090 of the Unemployment Insurance CodeState Hospitals (commencing with Section 7200 of the Welfare andInstitutions Code)Section 7277.1 of the Welfare
 and Institutions CodeMedi-Cal Act (commencing with Section 14000 of the Welfare and Institutions Code)Section 9202 of the Probate CodeWaxman-Duffy Prepaid Health Plan Act (commencing with Section 14200 of the Welfare and Institutions Code)Section 9202 of the Probate Code

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 50.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

19202.

(a) If the trustee knows or has reason to believe that the deceased settlor received health care under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or was the surviving spouse of a person who received that health care, the trustee shall give the State Director of Health Services notice of the death of the deceased settlor or surviving spouse in the manner provided in Section 215.

(b) The director has four months after notice is given in which to file a claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 159, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

19203.

If property in the trust is distributed before expiration of the time allowed a public entity to file a claim, the public entity has a claim against the distributees to the full extent of the public entity’s claim or each distributee’s share of the distributed property, as set forth in Section 19402, whichever is less. The public entity’s claim against distributees includes interest at a rate equal to that specified in Section 19521 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, from the date of distribution or the date of filing the claim by the public entity, whichever is
 later, plus other accruing costs as in the case of enforcement of a money judgment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 159, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

19204.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to affect the order of priority of debts provided for under other provisions of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 992, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

19205.

This chapter does not apply to liability for the restitution of amounts illegally acquired through the means of a fraudulent, false, or incorrect representation, or a forged or unauthorized endorsement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 992, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Allowance and Rejection of Claims [19250. - 19255.]

19250.

When a claim is filed, the trustee shall allow or reject the claim in whole or in part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 992, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

19251.

(a) Any allowance or rejection shall be in writing. The trustee shall file the allowance or rejection with the court clerk and give notice to the claimant, together with a copy of the allowance or rejection, as provided in Section 1215. 

(b) The allowance or rejection shall contain the following information: 

(1) The name of the claimant. 

(2) The date of the settlor’s death. 

(3) The total amount of the claim.

(4) The amount allowed or rejected by the trustee. 

(5) A statement that the claimant has 90 days from the time the notice of rejection is given, or 90 days after the claim becomes due, whichever is later, in which to bring an action on a claim rejected in whole or in part. 

(c) The Judicial Council shall prescribe an allowance or rejection form, which may be part of the claim form. Use of a form prescribed by the Judicial Council is deemed to satisfy the requirements. 

(d) This section does not apply to a demand the trustee elects to treat as a claim under Section 19154.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 992, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

19252.

The trustee shall have the power to pay any claim or portion of a claim and payment shall constitute allowance of the claim to the extent of the payment. The trustee shall have the power to compromise any claim or portion of a claim. If the trustee or the attorney for the trustee is a creditor of the deceased settlor, the trustee shall have the same powers regarding allowance, rejection, payment, or compromise set forth in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 159, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

19253.

(a) A claim barred by the statute of limitations may not be allowed by the trustee. 

(b) The filing of a claim tolls the statute of limitations otherwise applicable to the claim until the trustee gives notice of allowance or rejection. 

(c) The allowance of a claim further tolls the statute of limitations as to the part of the claim allowed until the allowed portion of the claim is paid. 

(d) Notwithstanding the statute of limitations otherwise applicable to a claim, if an action on a rejected claim is not commenced or if the matter is not referred to a referee or to arbitration within the time prescribed in Section 19255, it is forever barred.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 992, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

19254.

If within 30 days after a claim is filed the trustee has refused or neglected to act on the claim, the refusal or neglect may, at the option of the claimant, be deemed equivalent to the giving of a notice of rejection on the 30th day.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 992, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

19255.

(a) A rejected claim is barred as to the part rejected unless the creditor brings an action on the claim or the matter is referred to a referee or to arbitration within the following times, excluding any time during which there is a vacancy in the office of the trustee:

(1) If the claim is due at the time of giving the notice of rejection, 90 days after the notice is given.

(2) If the claim is not due at the time of giving the notice of rejection, 90 days after the claim becomes due.

(b) In addition to any other county in which an action on a rejected claim may be commenced, the action may be commenced in the county or city and county wherein the principal place of administration of the trust is located.

(c) The creditor shall file a notice of the pendency of the action or the referral to a referee or to arbitration with the court clerk in the trust proceeding, together with proof of giving a copy of the notice to the trustee as provided in Section 1215. Personal service of a copy of the summons and complaint on the trustee is equivalent to the filing and giving of the notice.

(d) Any property distributed by the trustee under the terms of the trust after 120 days from the later of the time the notice of rejection is given or the claim is due and before the notice of pendency of action or referral or arbitration is filed and given, excluding therefrom any time during which there is a vacancy in the office of the trustee, is not subject to the claim. Neither the trustee nor the distributee is liable on account of the distribution.

(e) The prevailing party in the action shall be awarded court costs and, if the court determines that the prosecution or defense of the action against the prevailing party was unreasonable, the prevailing party shall be awarded reasonable litigation expenses, including attorney’s fees. For the purpose of this subdivision, the prevailing party shall be the trustee if the creditor recovers an amount equal to or less than the amount of the claim allowed by the trustee, and shall be the creditor if the creditor recovers an amount greater than the amount of the claim allowed by the trustee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 159, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Claims Established by Judgment [19300. - 19304.]

19300.

(a) Except as provided in Section 19303, after the death of the settlor all money judgments against the deceased settlor on a claim against the deceased settlor or against the trustee on a claim against the decedent or the trust estate are payable in the course of administration and are not enforceable against property in the trust estate of the deceased settlor under the Enforcement of Judgments Law (Title 9 (commencing with Section 680.010) of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure). 

(b) Subject to Section 19301, a judgment referred to in subdivision (a) shall be filed in the same manner as other claims.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 992, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

19301.

When a money judgment against a trustee in a representative capacity becomes final, it conclusively establishes the validity of the claim for the amount of the judgment. The judgment shall provide that it is payable out of property in the deceased settlor’s trust estate in the course of administration. An abstract of the judgment shall be filed in the trust administration proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 992, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

19302.

(a) Notwithstanding the death of the settlor, a judgment for possession of trust property or a judgment for sale of trust property may be enforced under the Enforcement of Judgments Law (Title 9 (commencing with Section 680.010) of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure). Nothing in this subdivision authorizes enforcement under the Enforcement of Judgments Law against any property in the trust estate of the deceased settlor other than the property described in the judgment for possession or sale. 

(b) After the death of the settlor, a demand for money that is not satisfied from the trust property described in a judgment for sale of property shall be filed as a claim in the same manner as other claims and is payable in the course of administration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 992, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

19303.

If trust property of the deceased settlor is subject to an execution lien at the time of the settlor’s death, enforcement against the property may proceed under the Enforcement of Judgments Law (Title 9 (commencing with Section 680.010) of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure) to satisfy the judgment. The levying officer, as defined in Section 680.260 of the Code of Civil Procedure, shall account to the trustee for any surplus. If the judgment is not satisfied, the balance of the judgment remaining unsatisfied is payable in the course of administration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 992, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

19304.

(a) An attachment lien may be converted into a judgment lien on property in the trust estate subject to the attachment lien, with the same priority as the attachment lien, in either of the following cases:

(1) Where the judgment debtor dies after entry of judgment in an action in which the property was attached.

(2) Where a judgment is entered after the death of the defendant in an action in which the property was attached.

(b) To convert the attachment lien into a judgment lien, the levying officer shall, after entry of judgment in the action in which the property was attached and before the expiration of the attachment lien, do one of the following:

(1) Serve an abstract of the judgment, and a notice that the attachment lien has become a judgment lien, on the trustee or other person holding property subject to the attachment lien.

(2) Record or file in any office where the writ of attachment and notice of attachment are recorded or filed an abstract of the judgment and a notice that the attachment lien has become a judgment lien. If the attached property is real property, the plaintiff or the plaintiff’s attorney may record the required abstract and notice with the same effect as if recorded by the levying officer.

(c) After the death of the settlor, any members of the deceased settlor’s family who were supported in whole or in part by the deceased settlor may claim an exemption provided in Section 487.020 of the Code of Civil Procedure for property levied on under the writ of attachment if the right to the exemption exists at the time the exemption is claimed. The trustee may claim the exemption on behalf of members of the deceased settlor’s family. The claim of exemption may be made at any time before the time the abstract and notice are served, recorded, or filed under subdivision (b) with respect to the property claimed to be exempt. The claim of exemption shall be made in the same manner as an exemption is claimed under Section 482.100 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 159, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Allocation of Debts Between Trust and Surviving Spouse [19320. - 19326.]

19320.

If it appears that a debt of the deceased settlor has been paid or is payable in whole or in part from property in the deceased settlor’s trust, then the trustee, the surviving spouse, the personal representative, if any, of a deceased settlor’s probate estate, or a beneficiary may petition for an order to allocate the debt.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 48, Sec. 8.   (SB 785)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

19321.

A petition under Section 19320 shall include a statement of all of the following:

(a) All debts of the deceased settlor and surviving spouse known to the petitioner that are alleged to be subject to allocation and whether paid in whole or in part or unpaid. 

(b) The reason why the debts should be allocated. 

(c) The proposed allocation and the basis for allocation alleged by the petitioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 992, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

19322.

If it appears from the petition under Section 19320 that allocation would be affected by the value of the separate property of the surviving spouse and any community property and quasi-community property not administered in the trust, and if an inventory and appraisal of the property has not been provided by the surviving spouse, the court shall make an order to show cause why the information should not be provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 992, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

19323.

(a) At least 30 days before the time set for the hearing on the petition, the petitioner shall cause notice of the time and place of the hearing and a copy of the petition to be served on the surviving spouse in the manner provided in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 413.10) of Title 5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(b) At least 30 days before the time set for the hearing on the petition, the petitioner shall cause notice of the time and place of hearing, together with a copy of the petition, to be delivered pursuant to Section 1215 to each of the following persons who are not petitioners:

(1) All trustees
 of the trust and of any trusts to which an allocation of liability may be approved by the court pursuant to the petition.

(2) All beneficiaries affected.

(3) The personal representative of the deceased settlor’s probate estate, if any is known to the trustee.

(4) The Attorney General, if the petition relates to a charitable trust subject to the jurisdiction of the Attorney General, unless the Attorney General waives notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 105.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)